Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of statutes or regulations governing practice of veterinary medicine, 8 ALR4th 223.

§ 33-30-101.
Filing of forged or fictitious diploma.

Any person, filing, or attempting to file, as his own, the diploma of another, or a forged or fictitious diploma, or a fraudulently obtained diploma, certificate, license, or affidavit, upon conviction thereof shall be subject to the penalty provided by the statutes of the state of Wyoming for the crime of forgery.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 125, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 3816; R.S. 1931, § 103-408; C.S. 1945, § 37-2308; Laws 1949, ch. 34, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 33-378.

Cross references. —

As to forgery generally, see §

6-3-601

et seq.

§ 33-30-102.
Veterinary officers to be licensed.

No person shall hereafter in this state or in any county or city thereof be appointed or elected to any public position requiring veterinary skill or knowledge, who has not, prior to his appointment or election become a duly licensed veterinarian.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 125, § 15; C.S. 1920, § 3821; R.S. 1931, § 103-413; C.S. 1945, § 37-2313; W.S. 1957, § 33-382.